District of Columbia statutes.
4-1371.14

Failure to make report.

Any person required to make a report under § 4-1371.12 who willfully fails to make the report shall be fined not more than $100 or imprisoned for not more than 30 days, or both. Violations of § 4-1371.12 shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia, or his or her agent, in the name of the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4614, 48 DCR 6981

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-20, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9090).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 14 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-40, April 25, 2001, 48 DCR 5917).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 14 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-82, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6355).